California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(e) For purposes of implementing the distribution of the renewal of registrations throughout the year, the director may extend by not more than six months, the date fixed by law for renewal of a registration, except that in that event any renewal fee that may be involved shall be prorated in a manner that no person shall be required to pay a greater or lesser fee than would have been required had the change in renewal dates not occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 401, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

9832.5.

(a) Registrations issued under this chapter shall expire no more than 12 months after the issue date. The expiration date of registrations shall be set by the director in a manner to best distribute renewal procedures throughout the year.

(b) To renew an unexpired registration, the service contractor shall, on or before the expiration date of the registration, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(c) To renew an expired registration, the service contractor shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, pay the renewal fee in effect on the
 last regular renewal date, and pay all accrued and unpaid delinquency and renewal fees. The bureau may impose conditions on a registration issued pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) Renewal is effective on the date that the application is filed, the renewal fee is paid, and all delinquency fees are paid.

(e) For purposes of implementing the distribution of the renewal of registrations throughout the year, the director may extend, by not more than six months, the date fixed by law for renewal of a registration, except that, in that event, any renewal fee that may be involved shall be prorated in such a manner that no person shall be required to pay a greater or lesser fee than would have been required had the change in renewal dates not occurred.

(f) A registration that is not renewed within six years of its expiration shall be canceled, but if the holder of the registration submits a new application and meets all of the following requirements, the registration may be reissued or reinstated:

(1) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists which would justify denial of registration under Section 480.

(2) The registrant pays all renewal, delinquency, and penalty fees that have accrued since the date on which the registration was last renewed. 

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 10.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9833.

A registrant shall notify the bureau in writing, within 30 days, of any change to the information provided by the form specified in Section 9830. A service dealer shall not be required to notify the bureau of employee changes. The director shall make regulations prescribing the procedure for keeping the registration information current.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 306, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Offenses Against the Chapter [9840. - 9853.]

9840.

It shall be unlawful to act as a service dealer without first having registered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and unless such registration is currently valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

9841.

(a) The director may deny, suspend, revoke, or place on probation the registration of a service dealer for any of the following acts or omissions done by himself or herself or any employee, partner, officer, or member of the service dealer and related to the conduct of his or her business:

(1) Making or authorizing any statement or advertisement that is untrue or misleading, and that is known, or which by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading.

(2) Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce a customer to authorize the repair, installation, service, or maintenance of the equipment as specified by this chapter.

(3) Any other conduct that constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(4) Conduct constituting incompetence or negligence.

(5) Failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or any regulation, rule, or standard established pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Any willful departure from or disregard of accepted trade standards for good and workmanlike installation or repair.

(7) Conviction of a crime that has a substantial relationship to the qualifications, functions and duties of a registrant under this chapter, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(8) A violation of any order of the bureau made pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The director may also deny, or may suspend, revoke, or place on probation, the registration of a service dealer if the applicant or registrant, as the case may be, has committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(c) The director may also deny, or may suspend, revoke, or place on probation, the registration of a service dealer if the applicant or registrant, as the case may be, will be or is holding the registration for the benefit of a former registrant whose registration has been suspended or revoked and who will continue to have some involvement in the applicant’s or new registrant’s business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9842.

All work done by a service dealer shall be recorded on an invoice in such detail as is required by regulations issued by the director and shall describe all service work done and all parts supplied. If any used parts are supplied, the invoice shall clearly state that fact. One copy shall be given to the customer and one copy shall be retained by the service dealer for a period of at least three years. If a copy of the invoice is provided to the customer in an electronic format, an electronic copy of the invoice shall be retained by the service dealer for the same retention period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 9.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9843.

The service dealer shall return replaced parts to the customer excepting such parts as may be exempted from this requirement by regulations of the director and excepting such parts as the service dealer needs to return to the manufacturer or distributor under a warranty arrangement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

9844.

An initial written estimate for the cost of repair shall be given to the customer before performing any repairs. The written estimate shall include all costs for parts and labor, and the service dealer may not charge for work done or parts supplied in excess of the estimate without the previous consent of the customer. The service dealer may charge a reasonable fee for services provided in determining the nature of the malfunction in preparation of a written estimate for repair. The service dealer shall advise the customer in writing of the amount of the fee prior to a repair made in the residence, before removal of the consumer goods from the customer’s residence, or upon acceptance of the goods at the repair facility or registered location. This section shall not prohibit the use of a written estimate in an
 electronic format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 10.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9844.1.

The charge for the installation of any equipment subject to the requirements of this chapter shall be given to the customer in writing prior to making the installation. Whenever the charge for installation is included in the sale price of the item and is not separately stated, or whenever the charge for installation is reduced as an incentive to effectuate the purchase and sale, the bureau may determine the reasonable charge attributable to the installation for purposes of enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 207, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

9844.5.

No lien or other right to maintain possession of the equipment pending payment of charges for repair or installation, including those arising from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3046) of Title 14, Part 4, Division 3 of the Civil Code, shall exist where the total charges levied for the repair or installation of such equipment exceeds the higher of (1) any amount estimated in writing pursuant to Section 9844, or (2) a written revision of such estimate signed and dated by the owner of the equipment, or in lieu thereof an oral revision of the written estimate, authorized by the owner and fully documented by the service dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 207, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

9845.

A service dealer may not make the compensation of any employee, partner, officer, or member dependent upon the value of parts replaced in any equipment by, or with the consent of, such employee, partner, officer, subcontractor, or member. This does not include the sale of equipment as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 9801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9846.

The use of “guarantee” and words of like import shall conform to the regulations adopted by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

9847.

Each service dealer shall maintain all records that are required by the regulations adopted to carry out the provisions of this chapter for a period of at least three years. These records shall be open for reasonable inspection by the director or other law enforcement officials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1265, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9847.5.

(a) Each service contractor shall maintain those records as are required by the regulations adopted to carry out the provisions of this chapter for a period of at least three years. These records shall be open for reasonable inspection by the director or other law enforcement officials.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 11.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9848.

All proceedings to contest a citation for a violation of subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 of the Vehicle Code or to deny registration or suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 2.   (SB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9849.

(a) The expiration of a valid registration shall not deprive the director of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation or hearing on a cease and desist order against a service dealer or service contractor or to render a decision to suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 81) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 12.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

9849.

(a) The expiration of a valid registration shall not deprive the director of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation or hearing on a cease and desist order against a service dealer or to render a decision to suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 82) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 13.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9850.

Any person who fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or of the regulations made pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9851.

(a) The superior court in and for the county wherein any person carries on, or attempts to carry on, business as a service dealer or service contractor in violation of the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation thereunder, shall, on application of the director, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct.

(b) The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the director shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of an adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 83) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 14.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 15 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

9851.

(a) The superior court in and for the county wherein any person carries on, or attempts to carry on, business as a service dealer in violation of the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation thereunder, shall, on application of the director, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct.

(b) The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the director shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of an adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 84) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 15.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9852.

No person required to have a valid registration under the provisions of this chapter shall have the benefit of any lien for labor or materials or the right to sue on a contract for repairs or installation done by such individual, unless he or she has such a valid registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 207, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.

(a) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a service dealer or service contractor is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The director may suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration, or may deny registration, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, allowing that person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty,
 or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 85) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 16.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 17 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.

(a) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a service dealer is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The director may suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration, or may deny registration, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing that person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the
 accusation, information, or indictment.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 86) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 17.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Service Contractors [9855. - 9855.9.]

9855.

The definitions used in this section shall govern the construction and terms as used in this chapter:

(a) “Service contract” means a contract in writing to perform, over a fixed period of time or for a specified duration, services relating to the maintenance, replacement, or repair of consumer goods and may include provisions for incidental payment of indemnity under limited circumstances, including, but not limited to, power surges, food spoilage, or accidental damage from handling. “Service contract” shall not include a contract in writing to maintain structural wiring associated with the delivery of cable, telephone, or other broadband communications services. “Service contract” shall not include a contract in which a consumer agrees to pay a provider of vision care services for a
 discount on optical products or contact lenses for a specified duration.

(b) “Service contract administrator” or “administrator” means a person who performs or arranges the collection, maintenance, or disbursement of moneys to compensate any party for claims or repairs pursuant to a service contract, and who also performs or arranges any of the following activities on behalf of service contract sellers:

(1) Providing service contract sellers with service contract forms.

(2) Participating in the adjustment of claims arising from service contracts.

(3) Arranging on behalf of service contract sellers the insurance required by Section 9855.2.

A service contract administrator shall not be an obligor on a service
 contract unless all service contracts under which the service contract administrator is obligated to perform are insured under a service contract reimbursement insurance policy.

(c) (1) “Service contract seller” or “seller” means a person who sells or offers to sell a service contract to a service contractholder, including a person who is the obligor under a service contract sold by the seller, manufacturer, or repairer of the product covered by the service contract.

(2) “Service contract seller” or “seller” also means a third party, including an obligor, who is not the seller, manufacturer, or repairer of the product. However, a third party shall not be an obligor on a service contract unless the obligor obtains a service contract reimbursement insurance policy for all service contracts under which the third party is obligated under the terms of a service
 contract.

(3) “Service contract seller” or “seller” shall not include the following:

(A) A bank or bank holding company, or the subsidiary or affiliate of either, or a financial institution, licensed under state or federal law, selling or offering to sell a service contract unless that entity is financially and legally obligated under the terms of a service contract.

(B) An electrical device manufacturer or electrical contractor who constructs, installs, or services electrical devices, which include any unit of an electrical system intended to carry electrical energy as part of a building’s electrical system, including raceways, conductors, invertors, conduit, wires, switches, or other similar devices.

(d) “Service contractholder” means a person who
 purchases or receives a service contract from a service contract seller.

(e) “Service contractor” means a service contract administrator or a service contract seller.

(f) “Service contract reimbursement insurance policy” means a policy of insurance issued by an insurer admitted to do business in this state providing coverage for all obligations and liabilities incurred by a service contract seller under the terms of the service contracts sold in this state by the service contract seller to a service contractholder. The service contract reimbursement insurance policy shall either cover all service contracts sold or specifically cover those contracts sold to residents of the State of California.

(g) “Obligor” is the entity financially and legally obligated under the terms of a service contract.

(h) “Optical products” means prescription and nonprescription eyewear. “Optical products” shall not include contact lenses of any kind.

(i) The terms “manufacturer,” “retail seller,” “retailer,” and “sale” shall have the same meanings ascribed to them in Section 1791 of the Civil Code.

(j) “Consumer goods” means any new or used product or part thereof that is used, bought, or leased for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, including assistive devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 18.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.05.

On and after January 1, 2000, for the purposes of this chapter, “service contract” also includes a service contract as described in subdivision (e) of Section 12741 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1075, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.1.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to act as a service contractor in this state unless that person first registers with the bureau in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and maintains a valid registration.

(b) Except as expressly provided in this chapter, service contractors registered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be exempt from all provisions of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 543, Sec. 2.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.15.

A service contract administrator who is an obligor on a service contract and is registered as a service contract administrator may perform all the functions permitted by a seller and shall not be required to register separately as a seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 543, Sec. 3.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.2.

(a) A service contract seller shall not issue, sell, or offer for sale a service contract unless the obligor under the service contract has complied with one of the following requirements:

(1) Files with the director one of the following:

(A) The most recent annual report on Form 10-K required by the Securities and Exchange Commission, reflecting a net worth greater than the sum of the deferred revenues from service contracts in force. If the service contractor is a foreign corporation that files a comparable audited financial statement with its home government or with the United States government, the director may
 deem that statement an acceptable substitute for Form 10-K.

(B) The most recent audited financial statement reflecting a net worth of not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). The financial statement shall be certified by a certified public accountant who is licensed in the state where the service contract seller maintains its principal place of business or the seller’s state of domestic incorporation.

(2) Obtains a service contract reimbursement insurance policy.

(3) Sells service contracts that are administered by a service contract administrator who has obtained a service contract reimbursement insurance policy covering the seller’s service contracts.

(4) Maintains and annually verifies to the director a funded account held in escrow
 equal to a minimum of 25 percent of the deferred revenues from the service contracts in force.

(b) A service contract administrator shall not administer service contracts sold in this state unless a service contract reimbursement insurance policy covering these service contracts has been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 543, Sec. 4.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.3.

(a) (1) The service contract form, along with all documents incorporated by reference into a service contract per the contract form, to be issued by the service contractor shall be filed with the director by the service contractor no later than 30 days prior to its use.

(2) The term “documents incorporated by reference” shall mean all documents that are expressly made a part of the contract but that are not a part of the body of the contract. These documents may include, but are not limited to, invoices, declaration pages, and sales receipts.

(3) Each service contract form shall be identified by a unique form number and date of last
 revision.

(4) Once a service contract form is filed with the director under paragraph (1), no further changes shall be made to the text of the contract form without resubmission of the contract form to the director, unless the text was indicated as variable text when the contract is initially filed with the director.

(b) Every service contract administrator shall file with its application for registration, and thereafter, with its application for registration renewal, a service contract reimbursement insurance policy.

(c) Every service contract seller shall file with his or her application for registration, and thereafter with his or her application for registration renewal, one of the following:

(1) The most recent annual report on Form 10-K required
 by the Securities and Exchange Commission, reflecting a net worth greater than the sum of the deferred revenues from service contracts in force. If the service contractor is a foreign corporation that files a comparable audited financial statement with its home government or with the United States government, the director may deem that statement an acceptable substitute for Form 10-K.

(2) A service contract reimbursement insurance policy.

(3) Evidence that his or her service contracts are administered by a service contract administrator who has obtained a service contract reimbursement insurance policy covering the seller’s service contracts.

(4) Evidence of a funded account held in escrow equal to a minimum of 25 percent of the deferred revenues from the service contracts in
 force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 20.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.4.

(a) The service contract reimbursement insurance policy shall cover the obligations of the service contract seller under the service contracts sold during the period of time that the service contract reimbursement insurance policy was in force. The service contract reimbursement insurance policy shall either cover all service contracts sold or specifically cover those contracts sold to residents of the State of California.

(b) A service contract reimbursement insurance policy shall contain a provision under which the insurer shall notify the bureau in writing of the termination or nonrenewal of the service contract reimbursement insurance policy.

(c) Upon the effective date of the termination or cancellation of a service contractor’s service contract reimbursement insurance policy, the registration of the service contractors whose service contracts are covered thereby shall be automatically suspended, unless the affected service contractors have filed with the director, prior to the date of the termination or cancellation of the service contract reimbursement insurance policy, a new service contract reimbursement insurance policy or otherwise meet one of the requirements of Section 9855.2. Upon receipt of a written request from the service contractor, the director may delay the suspension of a service contractor’s registration for no more than 60 days. Following the automatic suspension, an administrative hearing shall be provided upon written request to the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1265, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.5.

A service contractor shall comply with the provisions of Sections 1794.4 and 1794.41 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1265, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.6.

Where a service contractholder cancels a service contract in accordance with Section 1794.41 of the Civil Code and the refund due is not paid to the service contractholder or credited to his or her account within 30 days after the service contractor receives written notice of cancellation, the amount of the required refund or credit shall bear interest, payable to the service contractholder, at the rate of 10 percent per annum for each additional 30 days or fraction thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.7.

The director may deny, or may suspend, revoke, or place on probation the registration of a service contractor for any act, omission, or crime that is committed by the service contractor or any employee, partner, officer, or agent of the service contractor for any of the following reasons:

(a) Any conduct that constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(b) Conviction of a crime that has a substantial relationship to the qualifications, functions and duties of a registrant under this chapter, in which event the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(c) Assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this article, or of regulations adopted under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.8.

(a) The director may issue a citation to the service contractor for any of the following reasons:

(1) Violation of subdivision (a) of Section 9855.3 or Section 9855.5, or any regulation adopted thereunder.

(2) Upon a determination by the director that the service contractor has committed a violation by (A) making or authorizing statements or advertisements which are untrue or misleading; or (B) making false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce a customer to purchase a service contract as provided by this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this section, a violation consists of a single publication or single course of conduct that is determined by the director to be untrue or misleading.

(b) The citation may contain an order of abatement and an order to pay an administrative fine assessed by the director.

(1) Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated.

(2) Where appropriate, the citation shall contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation.

(3) A citation or fine assessment issued pursuant to a citation shall inform the service contractor that if he or she desires a hearing to contest the finding of a violation, that hearing shall be requested by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation or assessment. If a hearing is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) (A) In addition to requesting a hearing as provided for herein, the service contractor may request a citation review conference with the director or his or her designee regarding the acts charged in the citation. A citation review conference shall be requested by written notice to the bureau within 20 days of the date of the issuance of the citation or assessment.

(B) The director or his or her designee shall hold a citation review conference within 60 days from the receipt of the request. At the conclusion of the citation review conference, the director or his or her designee shall state, in writing, the reasons for his or her action and transmit a copy of his or her findings and decision to the service contractor.

(5) The failure of a service contractor to pay a fine within 30 days of the date of assessment, unless the citation is being appealed, may result in disciplinary action being taken by the director. Where a citation is not contested and a fine is not paid, the full amount of the assessed fine shall be added to the fee for renewal of the registration. A registration shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(c) Where a citation includes an administrative fine, it shall be issued in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) For the first citation, the director may assess an administrative fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) but not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) For the second citation issued during any one-year period, the director may assess an administrative fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) For the third citation issued during any two-year period, the director may assess an administrative fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(4) For the fourth violation of subdivision (a) of Section 9855.3 or of Section 9855.5, or any regulation adopted thereunder, during any two-year period, the director may either assess an administrative fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration of the service contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.85.

Unless otherwise lawfully transacting the business of insurance pursuant to a certificate of authority issued pursuant to Section 700 of the Insurance Code for the appropriate class, a service contract administrator or third-party seller acting as an obligor on a service contract without having a service contract reimbursement insurance policy covering all service contracts under which the service contract administrator or third-party seller is obligated shall be deemed to be unlawfully transacting the business of insurance and shall be subject to subdivision (b) of Section 700 and Section 12921.8 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 543, Sec. 5.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 9855.9.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.9.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 19.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4.5, commencing with Section 9855.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Informal Adjustment of Complaints [9860. - 9863.]

9860.

(a) The director shall establish procedures for accepting complaints from the public against any service dealer or service contractor.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 88) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 20.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 21 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

9860.

(a) The director shall establish procedures for accepting complaints from the public against any service dealer.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 89) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 21.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9861.

If the complaint does not appear to state any violations of this chapter or of the regulations made pursuant to this chapter, the director shall so advise the complainant and take no further action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

9862.

If a complaint indicates a possible violation of this chapter or of the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director may advise the service dealer of the contents of the complaint and, if the service dealer is so advised, the director shall make a summary investigation of the facts after the service dealer has had reasonable opportunity to reply thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1275, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9862.5.

(a) If a complaint indicates a possible violation of this chapter or of the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director may advise the service contractor of the contents of the complaint and, if the service contractor is so advised, the director shall make a summary investigation of the facts after the service contractor has had reasonable opportunity to reply thereto.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 22.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9863.
